Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 9. Enrichment of Flour and Bread

§§ 35-7-901 through 35-7-906.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 37, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions regulating food industry, see §

35-7-123

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1945, ch. 148, §§ 1 through 6, related to the enrichment of flour and bread.